apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="vál/ec__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ec</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ců</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cům</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ec</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cích</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cem</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="věc__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ech</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="moc__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r></r>
      </p>
        <par n="věc__n"/> 
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ích</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="o/ko__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>či</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čí</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kům</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čím</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>či</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>či</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kách</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čích</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kem</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čima</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <!-- FIXME: there's another form of this -->
    <pardef n="dobyt/ek__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kem</l>
        <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="bezbožnost"><i>bezbožnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezmoc"><i>bezmoc</i><par n="moc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beztrestnost"><i>beztrestnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bázlivost"><i>bázlivost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kosatec"><i>kosat</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chtivost"><i>chtivost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobetek"><i>dobet</i><par n="dobyt/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dospělost"><i>dospělost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="funkčnost"><i>funkčnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hlasitost"><i>hlasitost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horlivost"><i>horlivost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jasnost"><i>jasnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jírovec"><i>jírov</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konec"><i>kon</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kořist"><i>kořist</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kyselost"><i>kyselost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="křemenec"><i>křemen</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lenost"><i>lenost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maličkost"><i>maličkost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moc"><i>moc</i><par n="moc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monotónnost"><i>monotónnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mstivost"><i>mstivost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nedokonalost"><i>nedokonalost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nelaskavost"><i>nelaskavost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nemoc"><i>nemoc</i><par n="moc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nerovnost"><i>nerovnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nespravedlnost"><i>nespravedlnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nevěrohodnost"><i>nevěrohodnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nevěstinec"><i>nevěstin</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="náchylnost"><i>náchylnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oko"><i>o</i><par n="o/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obranyschopnost"><i>obranyschopnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odpovědnost"><i>odpovědnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odstavec"><i>odstav</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostrost"><i>ostrost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="palec"><i>pal</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plachost"><i>plachost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podobnost"><i>podobnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pomoc"><i>pomoc</i><par n="moc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="použitelnost"><i>použitelnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pracovitost"><i>pracovitost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pražec"><i>praž</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="preciznost"><i>preciznost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prosinec"><i>prosin</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pružnost"><i>pružnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pískovec"><i>pískov</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="přilnavost"><i>přilnavost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příležitost"><i>příležitost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rovnost"><i>rovnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rámec"><i>rám</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="různorodost"><i>různorodost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="setrvačnost"><i>setrvačnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slavnost"><i>slavnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sounáležitost"><i>sounáležitost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="specifičnost"><i>specifičnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="společnost"><i>společnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="státnost"><i>státnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tajnost"><i>tajnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trpělivost"><i>trpělivost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umírněnost"><i>umírněnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velikost"><i>velikost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vlhkost"><i>vlhkost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vyčerpanost"><i>vyčerpanost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="válec"><i>vál</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="výslovnost"><i>výslovnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="věnec"><i>věn</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zadluženost"><i>zadluženost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zvyklost"><i>zvyklost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="úmrtnost"><i>úmrtnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="červenec"><i>červen</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="činnost"><i>činnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čtverec"><i>čtver</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="životnost"><i>životnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koberec"><i>kober</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="osobnost"><i>osobnost</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="růženec"><i>růžen</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sirotčinec"><i>sirotčin</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tanec"><i>tan</i><par n="vál/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="účast"><i>účast</i><par n="věc__n"/></e>
